Washington statutes.
RCW 36.12.030

Notice of election—Election, how held.

Notice of the election, clearly stating the object, shall be given, and the election must be held and conducted, and the returns made, in all respects in the manner prescribed by law in regard to elections for county officers.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.12.030. Prior: 1890 p 318 s 3; RRS s 4000.]